Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-154
County board; special sessions; notice.

The county clerk shall have the power to call special sessions when the interests of the county demand it, upon giving five days' notice of the time and object of calling the commissioners together, by posting up notices in three public places in the county, or by publication in a newspaper published therein.

Laws 1879, § 57, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 982;

C.S.1922, § 882;

C.S.1929, § 26-136;

R.S.1943, § 23-154.

Failure of clerk to publicize special meeting regarding initiative petition for hospital bond election did not invalidate resulting election. Shadbolt v. County of Cherry, 185 Neb. 208, 174 N.W.2d 733 (1970).

Failure of county clerk to make record of call for special meeting of county board does not invalidate call, where it was in fact made and due notice given, and record of county board shows meeting pursuant thereto. Brooks v. MacLean, 95 Neb. 16, 144 N.W. 1067 (1914).

Meetings are presumed to be regularly called. Green v. Lancaster County, 61 Neb. 473, 85 N.W. 439 (1901).

Board can transact business only at regular or called meeting. Morris v. Merrell, 44 Neb. 423, 62 N.W. 865 (1895).

Two members of the board, when agreed, may transact business, and may call an election. State ex rel. Harvey v. Piper, 17 Neb. 614, 24 N.W. 204 (1885).

Board is not confined to business mentioned in call. Commissioners of Kearney County v. Kent, 5 Neb. 227 (1876).